Washington statutes.
RCW 13.22.060

Information reporting—Data report to the legislature.

(1) Information collected under RCW 13.22.040(2), 13.22.050(2), and 13.04.116(1)(c) must be reported to the department of children, youth, and families by December 1, 2021, and an updated report must be submitted to the department by November 1, 2022. The department must compile the reported data and, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, provide a data report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

(2) Beginning in January 2023, the department shall conduct periodic reviews of policies, procedures, and use of solitary confinement, isolation, and room confinement in juvenile detention facilities and institutions. Every three years, the department shall prepare a report to the legislature summarizing its reviews.

[ 2020 c 333 s 7.]